zh-CN: 支撑结构类型: 充气气柱框架; 支撑杆; 弹出式中心枢纽; 刚性铝框; 其他
vi: Loại cấu trúc hỗ trợ: Khung bơm hơi; Cột; Trục tự bung; Khung nhôm cứng; Khác
en: Support structure type: Inflatable airframe; Pole; Pop-up hub; Rigid aluminum frame; Other
bg-BG: Тип опорна конструкция: Надуваема конструкция; Рейка; Изскачаща рамка; Твърда алуминиева рамка; Друго
nl: Steun structuur type: Opblaasbaar airframe; Stok; Pop-up-hub; Stijf aluminium frame; Overig
ja: サポート構造タイプ: インフレータブルエアフレーム; ポール; ポップアップハブ; リジッドアルミニウムフレーム; その他
hu: Tartószerkezet típusa: Felfújható váz; Rúd; Pop-up váz; Merev alumíniumváz; Egyéb
it: Tipo di struttura di supporto: Struttura gonfiabile; Palo; Snodo pop-up; Telaio rigido in alluminio; Altro
ru: Тип опорной конструкции: Надувной каркас; Опора; Быстросборный хабовый каркас; Жесткий алюминиевый каркас; Другое
cs: Typ struktury podpory: Nafukovací konstrukce; Tyč; Pop-up střed; Pevný hliníkový rám; Jiné
nb: Støttestrukturtype: Oppblåsbar ramme; Stang; Pop-up-nav; Stiv aluminiumsramme; Annet
el: τύπος δομής υποστήριξης: Φουσκωτό αεροπλαίσιο; Στύλος; Κόμβος pop-up; Άκαμπτο πλαίσιο αλουμινίου; Άλλο
pt-BR: Estrutura de suporte tipo: Armação de ar inflável; Vareta; Pop-up com cubo; Estrutura rígida de alumínio; Outros
da: Type af støttestruktur: Oppustelig luftramme; Stang; Pop op-nav; Stiv aluminiumsramme; Andet
fr: Type de structure de support: Structure gonflable; Arceau; Moyeu pop-up; Cadre en aluminium rigide; Autre
sl-SI: Vrsta podporne strukture: Napihljiva zračna konstrukcija; Palica; Samopostavljivo (pop-up) vozlišče; Tog aluminijast okvir; Drugo
pt-PT: Tipo de estrutura de suporte: Estrutura de ar insuflável; Poste; Cubo pop-up; Estrutura rígida de alumínio; Outro
zh-TW: 支撐結構類型: 充氣氣柱框架; 支桿; 彈出式軸心; 堅固鋁合金框架; 其他
es: Tipo de estructura del soporte: Estructura inflable; Poste; Estructura desplegable; Marco rígido de aluminio; Otro
fi: Tukirakenteen tyyppi: Ilmatäytteinen runko; Sauva; Pop-up-keskiö; Jäykkä alumiinirunko; Muu
de: Art der Stützstruktur: Aufblasbarer Luftrahmen; Stange; Pop-up-Hub; Starrer Aluminiumrahmen; Sonstige
tr: Destek yapısı tipi: Şişirilebilir hava iskeleti; Direk; Açılır göbek (hub); Sert alüminyum çerçeve; Diğer
pl: Typ konstrukcji wsporczej: Dmuchany stelaż powietrzny; Pałąk; Stelaż parasolkowy (pop-up); Sztywny stelaż aluminiowy; Inny
sv: typ av stödstruktur: Uppblåsbar luftram; Stång; Pop-up-nav; Styv aluminiumram; Övrigt
ko: 지지 구조 유형: 공기 주입식 에어프레임; 폴; 팝업 허브; 견고한 알루미늄 프레임; 기타
ro-RO: Tip de structură de susținere: Structură pneumatică gonflabilă; Stâlp; Sistem pop-up central; Cadru rigid din aluminiu; Altele
hr-HR: Tip strukture potpore: Okvir na napuhavanje; Šipka; Pop-up središte; Čvrsti aluminijski okvir; Ostalo
sk-SK: Typ podpornej konštrukcie: Nafukovací rám; Tyč; Rozkladacia konštrukcia; Pevný hliníkový rám; Iné
th: ประเภทโครงสร้างความช่วยเหลือ: โครงสร้างแบบเป่าลม; เสา; ฮับแบบป๊อปอัพ; โครงอะลูมิเนียมแข็ง; อื่นๆ
lt-LT: Atraminės konstrukcijos tipas: Pripučiamas rėmas; Stiebas; Išsiskleidžiantis (pop-up) mazgas; Standus aliuminio rėmas; Kitas